Utah statutes.
67-8-4.   State Elected Official and Judicial Compensation Commission
created -- Composition -- Appointment -- Terms -- Organization -- Vacancies --
Quorum -- Compensation -- Secretary.
(1)  There is created a state Elected Official and Judicial Compensation
Commission comprised of six members, not more than three of whom may be from
the same political party, appointed as follows:
(a)  one member appointed by the governor;
(b)  one member appointed by the president of the Senate;
(c)  one member appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives;
(d)  two members appointed by the other three appointed members; and
(e)  one member appointed by the State Bar Commission.
(2) (a)   Except as required by Subsection (2)(b), all persons appointed to
the commission shall serve four-year terms or until their successors are duly
appointed and qualified.
(b)  Notwithstanding the requirements of Subsection (2)(a), the appointing
authority shall, at the time of appointment or reappointment, adjust the
length of terms to ensure that the terms of commission members are staggered
so that approximately half of the commission is appointed every two years.
(3) (a)  The commission shall select a chair and a vice chair from opposite
political parties at its first meeting.
(b)  Four members of the commission shall constitute a quorum.
(c)  The commission shall take no action nor make any determination without
the concurrence of a majority of its members being present.
(4)  When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the replacement
shall be appointed for the unexpired term.
(5)  No member or employee of the legislative, judicial, or executive branch
of government is eligible for appointment to the commission.  The legislative
fiscal analyst shall serve as an ex officio, nonvoting secretary of the
commission.
(6) (a)  Members shall receive no compensation or benefits for their services,
but may receive per diem and expenses incurred in the performance of the
member’s official duties at the rates established by the Division of Finance
under Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.
(b)  Legislators on the committee shall receive compensation and expenses as
provided by law and legislative rule.
